Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4884.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 APPROPRIATIONS Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin new text end new text begin The sums shown in the columns marked "Appropriations" are added to or, if shown in parentheses, subtracted from the appropriations in Laws 2025, First Special Session chapter 6, article 1, to the agencies and for the purposes specified in this article. The appropriations are from the general fund, or another named fund, and are available for the fiscal years indicated for each purpose. The figures "2026" and "2027" used in this article mean that the appropriations listed under them are available for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, or June 30, 2027, respectively. "The first year" is fiscal year 2026. "The second year" is fiscal year 2027. "The biennium" is fiscal years 2026 and 2027. new text end new text begin APPROPRIATIONS new text end new text begin Available for the Year new text end new text begin Ending June 30 new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DEPARTMENT OF EMPLOYMENT AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENTnew text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Total Appropriation new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 10,000,000 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 3,500,000 new text end new text begin Appropriations by Fund new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin 2027 new text end new text begin General new text end new text begin 10,000,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin Workforce Development new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 3,500,000 new text end new text begin The amounts that may be spent for each purpose are specified in the following subdivisions. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Business and Community Development new text end new text begin 10,000,000 new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin $10,000,000 the first year is for emergency relief loans to businesses under article 4. This appropriation is onetime and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Workforce Development Services new text end new text begin -0- new text end new text begin 3,500,000 new text end new text begin $3,500,000 the second year from the workforce development fund is for grants to expand service opportunities, including but not limited to the ServeMinnesota Innovation Act, Minnesota Statutes, sections 124D.37 to 124D.45; the Domestic and Volunteer Service Act of 1973, United States Code, title 42, section 4950; and the National and Community Service Act of 1990, United States Code, title 42, section 12501. Of this amount, up to five percent may be used for administration of the grants. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end ARTICLE 2 PATHWAYS TO PROSPERITY Section 1. new text begin [116L.981] PATHWAYS TO PROSPERITY PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (c) "Pathways to Prosperity program" or "program" means the competitive grant program created in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner must establish the Pathways to Prosperity program to make competitive grants to government entities and nonprofit organizations for workforce training and development programs for adults facing barriers to employment. Programs must support and assist individuals to prepare for and find employment that provides long-term employment opportunities and leads to family-sustaining wage careers in in-demand industry sectors. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant process. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must award grants to applicants through a competitive grant process in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must develop scoring criteria for making grants. The criteria must include an evaluation of the applicant's capacity to: new text end new text begin (1) work with individuals facing barriers to employment such as the long-term unemployed, justice-impacted individuals, and individuals with limited English proficiency; new text end new text begin (2) prepare individuals for long-term employment opportunities with family-sustaining wages; new text end new text begin (3) align with the labor market of the community where the applicant operates; new text end new text begin (4) provide wraparound support services to assist individuals with entering and completing the program, including, but not limited to, assistance with housing, transportation, and child care, as well as adult basic education or English as a second language services; new text end new text begin (5) provide individualized counseling to achieve the individual's education and career goals; new text end new text begin (6) provide training and education components that lower barriers to completion and allow for accelerated attainment of goals; new text end new text begin (7) provide a career pathway for training that results in a relevant academic award, certificate, or industry-recognized credential that helps the individual enter or advance in a specific occupation or occupational cluster; and new text end new text begin (8) provide targeted placement and job search assistance for individuals who complete training. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must provide applicants with technical assistance to understand application procedures and program guidelines, and prioritize assistance to small organizations without prior state grant experience. All reporting requirements for grant recipients must be described in plain language in both the request for proposal and the grant contract. new text end new text begin (d) Successful grant recipients must: new text end new text begin (1) align services with the skill needs of high-growth industries in the state, regional, or local economy; new text end new text begin (2) prepare individuals to enter in-demand careers; new text end new text begin (3) provide counseling and support to achieve the individual's education and career goals; new text end new text begin (4) provide, as appropriate, education offered concurrently with and in the same context as workforce preparation activities and training for a specific occupation or occupational cluster; new text end new text begin (5) organize education, training, and other services to meet the particular needs of an individual, including education in English as a second language, in a manner that attempts to accelerate the educational and career advancement of the individual; new text end new text begin (6) enable an individual to attain a relevant academic award, certificate, or industry-recognized credential; new text end new text begin (7) assist an individual to enter or advance within a specific occupation or occupational cluster; and new text end new text begin (8) include partnerships with employers, workforce service providers, adult basic education providers, and post-secondary training providers, where one entity may fulfill multiple roles. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Performance metrics. new text end new text begin (a) Reporting and performance outcomes must comply with the requirements of section 116L.98. Performance requirements require results within 15 percent of contracted measurable outcomes, including the number of participants served. new text end new text begin (b) At least 60 percent of enrolled participants must exit the program by either: (1) obtaining unsubsidized employment at or above a family-sustaining wage as defined by the Department's Labor Market Information Office cost-of-living index adjusted for family size and location; or (2) continuing to participate in higher education. new text end ARTICLE 3 DRIVE FOR FIVE INDUSTRY SECTOR TRAINING Section 1. new text begin [116L.982] DRIVE FOR FIVE TRAINING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall establish the Drive for Five grant program to fill high-wage, high-demand job vacancies in an eligible industry sector. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Eligible industry" or "industry sector" means the following industries: technology, labor, care professions, manufacturing, and education and professional services. The term also includes any other industry the commissioner identifies based on the most recent labor market data if the industries listed in this paragraph no longer reflect current labor market conditions. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible organization" includes, but is not limited to, a nonprofit organization with active nonprofit tax filing status, a state or local government unit, including a Tribal government, a community action agency, a postsecondary institution, and a labor organization. new text end new text begin (d) "High-wage, high-demand" means occupations that represent at least 0.1 percent of total employment in the base year, have an annual median salary which is higher than the average for the current year, and are projected to have more total openings as a share of employment than the average. new text end new text begin (e) "Training" includes, but is not limited to, workforce development services, including job skills training, career counseling, case management, industry-recognized credential or certification attainment, work experience and internships, and support services. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant program. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall establish a competitive grant process to distribute awards under this section. The commissioner shall make grants to eligible organizations that provide training in a high-wage, high-demand industry sector. In awarding competitive grants, the commissioner shall give priority to eligible organizations that partner with employers and postsecondary education institutions. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin (a) Grants awarded under this section may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) job skills training that leads to or results in an industry-recognized credential; new text end new text begin (2) career counseling; new text end new text begin (3) case management; new text end new text begin (4) paid work-based learning opportunities; new text end new text begin (5) contextualized education programming that provides a tailored curricula to help students attain work readiness; new text end new text begin (6) support services; new text end new text begin (7) navigation services; and new text end new text begin (8) job placement and retention services. new text end new text begin (b) All awarded grants shall include a performance requirement within a 15 percent variance of contracted measurable outcomes including number enrolled. Sixty percent of enrolled participants must exit the program to unsubsidized employment at or above a wage designated by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Priority. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall prioritize awarding grants under this section to eligible organizations that partner with a Drive for Five industry partnership applicant under section 116L.983. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [116L.983] DRIVE FOR FIVE INDUSTRY PARTNERSHIPS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall establish a grant program for eligible organizations to better align workforce training efforts with employer demands by connecting workforce training participants to job vacancies. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section: new text end new text begin (1) "eligible organization" means a chamber of commerce with a 501(c)(6) tax filing or a trade association with a 501(c)(6) tax filing; and new text end new text begin (2) "industry sector employer" means an employer with current or anticipated employment opportunities in an eligible industry as defined in section 116L.982, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant program. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall award grants to eligible organizations that provide services that lead to employment. Recipients shall partner with employers with current or anticipated employment opportunities and workforce training partners participating in Drive for Five industry sector training under section 116L.982. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Eligible uses. new text end new text begin Grants awarded under this section may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) employer engagement strategies, including but not limited to business recruitment, job opening development, employee recruitment, and job matching; new text end new text begin (2) diversity, inclusion, and retention training of Drive for Five industry sector employers to increase the employer's understanding of attracting and retaining a diverse workforce; new text end new text begin (3) advanced skills training for incumbent workers of Drive for Five industry sector employers; and new text end new text begin (4) support services. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin Grant recipients must report quarterly to the commissioner the number of incumbent workers trained, names of employers trained or engaged, and the results of those efforts on the Drive for Five industry sector training programs. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Priority. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall prioritize awarding grants under this section to eligible organizations that partner with a Drive for Five industry sector training under section 116L.982. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [116L.984] DRIVE FOR FIVE EMPLOYER ENGAGEMENT TEAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin Within the limits of available appropriations for this section, the commissioner shall establish a Drive for Five employer engagement team which must consist of business service representatives who connect job seekers in Minnesota's job centers with businesses. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin Business service representatives shall: new text end new text begin (1) serve as the primary contact for businesses with hiring needs within a particular geography; new text end new text begin (2) engage with employers by matching employers to job seekers through candidate referrals, convening job fairs, and distributing job announcements; new text end new text begin (3) work with local area workforce boards and partners to identify candidates for openings in small- and medium-sized companies; and new text end new text begin (4) engage in workforce innovation solutions. new text end ARTICLE 4 BUSINESS AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT PROVISIONS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116J.435, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Development restrictions expiration. new text end new text begin If, within ten years from the date of the grant award under this section, the eligible project for which the public infrastructure was intended has not been developed, the public infrastructure may thereafter be used to support any other lawful project. The city or county must notify the commissioner of the alternative project. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin EMERGENCY RELIEF LOANS FOR IMPACTED SMALL BUSINESSES PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Borrower" means a recipient of a loan under this section. new text end new text begin (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (d) "Eligible recipient" means a business located in Minnesota that: new text end new text begin (1) demonstrates at least $200,000 in annual gross revenue but no more than $4,000,000 in annual gross revenue based on tax statements from the business's prior taxable year; new text end new text begin (2) operates from a physical commercial location; new text end new text begin (3) has at least one employee on payroll; new text end new text begin (4) does not primarily generate revenue from passive or speculative investments or from gambling activities; and new text end new text begin (5) has been in operation at least one year and can demonstrate that the business experienced economic injury of at least a 33 percent decline in gross revenue between December 1, 2025, and February 28, 2026, compared to the same time period in the previous year. new text end new text begin (e) "Partner organization" or "partner" means nonprofit corporations that have current contracts to enroll small business loans in the emerging entrepreneur program, the federal State Small Business Credit Initiative, or both, and that will provide loans under this section. new text end new text begin (f) "Physical commercial location" means a permanent location that is not a residence from which a business operates on a year-round basis. new text end new text begin (g) "Program" means the emergency relief loans for impacted small businesses program under this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner shall establish the emergency relief loans for impacted small businesses program to purchase a participation interest in loans made by partner organizations to eligible recipients. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may negotiate and enter into agreements with the partner organizations to purchase loans originated under this section. Agreements under this section are considered financial assistance agreements and are not considered procurement or grant contracts. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner may adopt guidelines, forms, and procedures necessary to implement this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Loan participation. new text end new text begin (a) A partner organization must enter into an agreement with the commissioner to make loans under this section. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall purchase a 100 percent participation interest in loans made to eligible recipients by partner organizations. new text end new text begin (c) Partner organizations are responsible for underwriting, servicing, and monitoring of loans purchased by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) A fee equal to eight percent of any loan made under this section must be paid to the partner organization at the time the participation interest is purchased to cover program administration and monitoring. new text end new text begin (e) Up to two percent of the amount appropriated to the commissioner under this section may be retained by the commissioner for administration of the program. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Loans to eligible recipients. new text end new text begin (a) A partner organization may make loans to eligible recipients for eligible uses. A loan to an eligible recipient under this subdivision must: new text end new text begin (1) be for no less than $2,500 and no more than $25,000; new text end new text begin (2) be for a term of no more than 39 months; new text end new text begin (3) charge an interest rate or fee of zero percent; new text end new text begin (4) not require repayment for at least 90 days after closing; new text end new text begin (5) require a personal guaranty from each beneficial owner; new text end new text begin (6) not charge any type of fee to eligible recipients; and new text end new text begin (7) not require any matching contributions from eligible recipients as a condition of the loan. new text end new text begin (b) Eligible uses for loan proceeds include current obligations related to payroll; lease or mortgage payments; inventory; insurance; property taxes; utilities; and other operating costs associated with ongoing operations. Borrowers must provide evidence that loan proceeds were used for eligible expenses. new text end new text begin (c) Loan proceeds must not be used for: new text end new text begin (1) purchase of fixed assets, construction, renovation, or leasehold improvements; or new text end new text begin (2) refinancing of debt. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Loan forgiveness. new text end new text begin (a) After making 18 consecutive on-time payments, the borrower may apply for forgiveness of up to 50 percent of the outstanding principal balance. new text end new text begin (b) For the purposes of taxable income, the forgivable portion of the loan is exempt from income tax reporting in Minnesota. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Partner program account. new text end new text begin (a) Partner organizations must establish a commissioner-certified account for the purpose of tracking loans purchased under this section. new text end new text begin (b) Loan payments received from borrowers by partner organizations shall be remitted to the commissioner no more than 30 days following the end of each calendar quarter so long as any balance remains outstanding on the loans. Remitted payments shall be deposited in the general fund as nondedicated revenue. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) By January 31, 2029, partner organizations making loans under this section must provide a report to the commissioner that includes descriptions of the eligible recipients supported by the program, amounts loaned, proposed and actual uses, and amount of loan forgiveness granted. new text end new text begin (b) By April 15, 2029, the commissioner must provide a report compiling the information received from a partner organization under paragraph (a) to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development. The report must also specify any partner organization that failed to provide the information required under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin This section expires December 31, 2033. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 5 CONSTRUCTION CODES AND LICENSING Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.33, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Class B installer. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions 1, 2, and 14, any individual holding a Class B installer license may lay out and install electrical wiring, apparatus and equipment on center pivot irrigation booms on the load side of the main service on farmsteads, and install such other electrical equipment as is approved by the commissioner.new text begin As of December 1, 2027, no new Class B installer licenses shall be issued. An individual who holds a Class B installer license as of December 1, 2027, may retain and renew the license and exercise the privileges the license grants.new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.36, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Licensesdeleted text begin ; bonddeleted text end . All inspectors shall hold licenses as master or journeyworker electricians under this chapter. deleted text begin All inspectors under contract with the department to provide electrical inspection services shall give bond in the amount of $1,000, conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties.deleted text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 326B.37, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Inspection fee for dwelling. (a) The inspection fee for a one-family dwelling and each dwelling unit of a two-family dwelling is the following: (1) the fee for each service or other source of power as provided in subdivision 3; (2) $165 for up to 30 feeders and circuits; and (3) for each additional feeder or circuit, the fee as provided in subdivision 4. This fee applies to each separate installation for new dwellings and where deleted text begin 15deleted text end new text begin 14new text end or more feeders or circuits are installed or extended in connection with any addition, alteration, or repair to existing dwellings. Where existing feeders and circuits are reconnected to overcurrent devices installed as part of the replacement of an existing panelboard, the fee for each reconnected feeder or circuit is $2. The maximum number of separate inspections shall be determined in accordance with subdivision 2. The fee for additional inspections or other installations is that specified in subdivisions 2, 4, 6, and 8. The installer may submit fees for additional inspections when filing the request for electrical inspection. The fee for each detached accessory structure directly associated with a dwelling unit shall be calculated in accordance with subdivisions 3 and 4. When included on the same request for electrical inspection form, inspection fees for detached accessory structures directly associated with the dwelling unit may be combined with the dwelling unit fees to determine the maximum number of separate inspections in accordance with subdivision 2. (b) The inspection fee for each dwelling unit of a multifamily dwelling with three or more dwelling units is $110 for a combination of up to 20 feeders and circuits and $12 for each additional feeder or circuit. This fee applies to each separate installation for each new dwelling unit and where ten or more feeders or circuits are installed or extended in connection with any addition, alteration, or repair to existing dwelling units. Where existing feeders or circuits are reconnected to overcurrent devices installed as part of the replacement of an existing panelboard, the fee for each reconnected feeder or circuit is $2. The maximum number of separate inspections for each dwelling unit shall be determined in accordance with subdivision 2. The fee for additional inspections or for inspection of other installations is that specified in subdivisions 2, 4, 6, and 8. These fees include only inspection of the wiring within individual dwelling units and the final feeder to that unit where the multifamily dwelling is provided with common service equipment and each dwelling unit is supplied by a separate feeder or feeders extended from common service or distribution equipment. The fee for multifamily dwelling services or other power source supplies and all other circuits is that specified in subdivisions 2 to 4. (c) A separate request for electrical inspection form must be filed for each dwelling unit that is supplied with an individual set of service entrance conductors. These fees are the one-family dwelling rate specified in paragraph (a). Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 326B.37, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Additions to fees of subdivisions 3 to 5. (a) The fee for the electrical supply for each manufactured home park lot is $35. This fee includes the service or feeder conductors up to and including the service equipment or disconnecting means. The fee for feeders and circuits that extend from the service or disconnecting means is that specified in subdivision 4. (b) The fee for each recreational vehicle site electrical supply equipment is $12 for each circuit originating within the equipment. The fee for recreational vehicle park services, feeders, and circuits is that specified in subdivisions 3 and 4. (c) The fee for each street, parking lot, or outdoor area lighting standard and each traffic signal standard is $5. Circuits originating within the standard or traffic signal controller shall not be used when calculating the fee for each standard. (d) The fee for transformers for light, heat, and power is $15 for transformers rated up to ten kilovolt-amperes and $30 for transformers rated in excess of ten kilovolt-amperes. The previous sentence does not apply to Class 1 transformers or power supplies for Class 1 power-limited circuits or to Class 2 or Class 3 transformers or power supplies. (e) The fee for transformers and electronic power supplies for electric signs and outline lighting is $5 per unit. (f) The fee for technology circuits or systems, and circuits of less than 50 volts, is 75 cents for each system device or apparatus. (g) The fee for each separate inspection of the bonding for a swimming pool, spa, fountain, an equipotential plane for an agricultural confinement area, or similar installation is deleted text begin $35deleted text end new text begin $55new text end . Bonding conductors and connections require an inspection before being concealed. (h) The fee for all wiring installed on center pivot irrigation booms is $35 plus $5 for each electrical drive unit. (i) The fee for retrofit modifications to existing lighting fixtures is 25 cents per luminaire. (j) When a separate inspection of a concrete-encased grounding electrode is performed, the fee is $55. (k) The fees required by subdivisions 3 and 4 are doubled for installations over 600 volts. (l) The fee for a class 4 circuit or system transmitter, receiver, or utilization equipment is $0.50 for each system device or apparatus. Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.37, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Investigation fee: work without electrical inspection request. (a) Whenever any work for which a request for electrical inspection is required has begun without the request for electrical inspection form being filed with the commissioner, a special investigation shall be made before a request for electrical inspection form is accepted. (b) An investigation fee, in addition to the full fee required by subdivisions 1 to 6new text begin and 16 to 18new text end , shall be paid before an inspection is made. The investigation fee is two times the minimum fee specified in subdivision 2 or the new text begin applicable new text end inspection fee required by subdivisions 1 to 6new text begin and 16 to 18new text end , whichever is greater, not to exceed $1,000. The payment of the investigation fee does not exempt any person from compliance with all other provisions of the department rules or statutes nor from any penalty prescribed by law. Sec. 6. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.33, subdivision 5, new text end new text begin is repealed effective December 1, 2027. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.33, subdivision 6, new text end new text begin is repealed effective August 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-08297 326B.33 LICENSES. Subd. 5. Coursework or experience. An applicant for a Class A or B installer license shall have completed a post high school course in electricity approved by the commissioner or shall have had at least one year of experience, approved by the commissioner, in electrical wiring. Subd. 6. Bond. Every Class A and Class B installer, as a condition of licensure, shall give bond to the state in the penal sum of $1,000. The bond must comply with section 326B.0921.